Utah statutes.
63A-1-109.5.   Department authority to operate a division as an internal service fund agency -- Exception.

(1)  Except as provided in Subsection (2) and subject to Section 63A-1-114 and provisions governing internal service funds or internal service fund agencies under Title 63J, Chapter 1, Budgetary Procedures Act, the department may operate a division described in Section 63A-1-109 as an internal service fund agency.

(2)  The department may not operate the division described in Subsection 63A-1-109(1)(f) as an internal service fund agency.

